incubator/sl-nouns.dix
    <pardef n="sten/a__n_f">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ah</l>
          <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ami</l>
          <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>e</l>
          <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>e</l>
          <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>i</l>
          <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>i</l>
          <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>o</l>
          <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="sin__n_m">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ove</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ovi</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ov</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="napoved__n_f">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ih</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>i</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>i</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>i</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>i</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>i</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>jo</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>mi</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="zlom__n_m">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>a</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ih</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="seč__n_m">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>a</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>u</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="/števec__n_m">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>števci</l>
          <r>števec<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>Števci</l>
          <r>števec<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="utež__n_f">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>i</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>i</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>i</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>mi</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="plast__n_f">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>i</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>i</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>i</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>mi</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="odvetnik__n_m">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>a</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>i</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ov</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="pripomoč/ek__n_m">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ek</l>
          <r>ek<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ek</l>
          <r>ek<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ka</l>
          <r>ek<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ke</l>
          <r>ek<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ki</l>
          <r>ek<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ki</l>
          <r>ek<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ki</l>
          <r>ek<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ki</l>
          <r>ek<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>kom</l>
          <r>ek<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>kov</l>
          <r>ek<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ku</l>
          <r>ek<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ku</l>
          <r>ek<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <e lm="razpust"><i>razpust</i><par n="seč__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="utež"><i>utež</i><par n="utež__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="števec"><i></i><par n="/števec__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="pograd"><i>pograd</i><par n="seč__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="odvetnik"><i>odvetnik</i><par n="odvetnik__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="stena"><i>sten</i><par n="sten/a__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="plast"><i>plast</i><par n="plast__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="dim"><i>dim</i><par n="seč__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="sprevod"><i>sprevod</i><par n="zlom__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="napoved"><i>napoved</i><par n="napoved__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="umik"><i>umik</i><par n="seč__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="seč"><i>seč</i><par n="seč__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="pločnik"><i>pločnik</i><par n="seč__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="pripomoček"><i>pripomoč</i><par n="pripomoč/ek__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="azil"><i>azil</i><par n="seč__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="vzor"><i>vzor</i><par n="seč__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="zlom"><i>zlom</i><par n="zlom__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="sin"><i>sin</i><par n="sin__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="terminal"><i>terminal</i><par n="seč__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="ekran"><i>ekran</i><par n="seč__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="mraz"><i>mraz</i><par n="seč__n_m"/></e>
